TagsCloudVisualization/dictionaries/Russian-English.aff
SFX d Y 2
SFX d 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX d 0 led [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX D Y 2
SFX D 0 led [^aeio][eiou]l
SFX D 0 led [^aeo]al

SFX d Y 1
SFX d 0 ling [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX D Y 9
SFX D 0 med [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX D 0 ned [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX D 0 ped [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX D 0 red [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX D 0 sed [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX D 0 ted [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX D 0 ved [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX D 0 zed [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX D e d ee

SFX d Y 3
SFX d e ing [^eioy]e
SFX d ie ying ie
SFX d y ied [^aeiou]y

SFX D Y 7
SFX D y ied [^aeiou]y
SFX D их ая [чхшщкжг]их
SFX D их ие их
SFX D их им их
SFX D их ую [чхшщкжг]их
SFX D их юю [^чхшщкжг]их
SFX D их яя [^чхшщкжг]их

SFX E Y 22
SFX E а ам а
SFX E а ами а
SFX E а ах а
SFX E а е а
SFX E а ов а
SFX E а ом а
SFX E а у а
SFX E е й ее
SFX E ый ее ый
SFX E ый ей ый
SFX E ь е ь
SFX E ь ем ь
SFX E ь ём ь
SFX E ь ю ь
SFX E ь я ь
SFX E я е [^и]я
SFX E я ей я
SFX E я ёй я
SFX E я ею я
SFX E я ёю я
SFX E я и я
SFX E я ю я

SFX F Y 35
SFX F 0 ю ь
SFX F а ой а
SFX F а у а
SFX F ая ой ая
SFX F ая ую ая
SFX F енок ят енок
SFX F ёнок ят ёнок
SFX F енок ята енок
SFX F ёнок ята ёнок
SFX F енок ятам енок
SFX F ёнок ятам ёнок
SFX F енок ятами енок
SFX F ёнок ятами ёнок
SFX F енок ятах енок
SFX F ёнок ятах ёнок
SFX F и а [чхшщкжг]и
SFX F и ам [чхшщкжг]и
SFX F и ами [чхшщкж]и
SFX F и ах [чхшщкжг]и
SFX F и у [чхшщкжг]и
SFX F и ю [^чхшщкжг]и
SFX F и я [^чхшщкжг]и
SFX F и ям [^чхшщкжг]и
SFX F и ями [^чхшщкж]и
SFX F и ях [^чхшщкжг]и
SFX F ок ка нок
SFX F ок ке нок
SFX F ок ком нок
SFX F ок ку нок
SFX F онок ат онок
SFX F онок ата онок
SFX F онок атам онок
SFX F онок атами онок
SFX F онок атах онок
SFX F ь и ь

SFX g Y 5
SFX g 0 ability [^aeiou][cl]
SFX g 0 ability [^cely]
SFX g 0 ability [acegilou]e
SFX g 0 ability [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX g 0 ability [aeiou]y

SFX G Y 11
SFX G 0 bing [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX G 0 ding [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX G 0 fing [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX G 0 ging [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX G 0 ing [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX G 0 ing [^e]
SFX G 0 ing [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX G 0 ing [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]
SFX G 0 ing [aeio][eiou]l
SFX G 0 ing [aeo]al
SFX G 0 ing [eoy]e

SFX g Y 1
SFX g 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]c

SFX G Y 2
SFX G 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX G 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]k

SFX g Y 1
SFX g 0 lability [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX G Y 17
SFX G 0 ling [^aeio][eiou]l
SFX G 0 ling [^aeo]al
SFX G 0 ming [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX G 0 ning [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX G 0 ping [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX G 0 ring [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX G 0 sing [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX G 0 ting [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX G 0 ving [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX G 0 zing [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX G 0 а [^ейкоья]
SFX G 0 е [^ейкоья]
SFX G 0 м я
SFX G 0 ми я
SFX G 0 у [^ейкоья]
SFX G 0 х я
SFX G 0 ым [^ежйкоцчшщья]

SFX g Y 1
SFX g e ability [^acegilou]e

SFX G Y 3
SFX G e ing [^eioy]e
SFX G e ing e
SFX G ie ying ie

SFX g Y 1
SFX g y iability [^aeiou]y

SFX G Y 47
SFX G ек ка ек
SFX G ек ке ек
SFX G ек ком ек
SFX G ек ку ек
SFX G ий ого ий
SFX G ий ом ий
SFX G ий ому ий
SFX G й го ой
SFX G й м ий
SFX G й м ой
SFX G й м ый
SFX G й му ой
SFX G йня ен йня
SFX G ла лась ла
SFX G ла ли ла
SFX G ла лись ла
SFX G ла ло ла
SFX G ла лось ла
SFX G ня ен [^аезийоуыь]ня
SFX G ой им ой
SFX G ок ка ок
SFX G ок ке ок
SFX G ок ком ок
SFX G ок ку ок
SFX G ый ого ый
SFX G ый ом ый
SFX G ый ому ый
SFX G ь е ь
SFX G ь ей ь
SFX G ь ем ь
SFX G ь ём ь
SFX G ь и ь
SFX G ь ю ь
SFX G ь я ь
SFX G ь ям ь
SFX G ь ями ь
SFX G ь ях ь
SFX G ьня ен ьня
SFX G я е [^и]я
SFX G я ей я
SFX G я ёй я
SFX G я ею я
SFX G я ёю я
SFX G я и я
SFX G я й [еиу]я
SFX G я ь [аеиоуы]ня
SFX G я ю я

SFX h Y 9
SFX h 0 bedly [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX h 0 dedly [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX h 0 dly e
SFX h 0 edly [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX h 0 edly [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX h 0 edly [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX h 0 edly [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX h 0 edly [aeiou]y
SFX h 0 fedly [^aeio][aeiou]f

SFX H Y 1
SFX H 0 fold .

SFX h Y 1
SFX h 0 gedly [^aeio][aeiou]g

SFX H Y 2
SFX H 0 h t
SFX H 0 hs t

SFX h Y 9
SFX h 0 kedly [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX h 0 kedly [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX h 0 ledly [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX h 0 medly [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX h 0 nedly [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX h 0 pedly [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX h 0 redly [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX h 0 sedly [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX h 0 tedly [^aeio][aiou]t

SFX H Y 3
SFX H 0 th [^ety]
SFX H 0 th [^y]
SFX H 0 ths [^ety]

SFX h Y 2
SFX h 0 vedly [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX h 0 zedly [^aeio][aeiou]z

SFX H Y 6
SFX H e th [^ev]e
SFX H e ths [^ev]e
SFX H ree ird ree
SFX H ree irds ree
SFX H ve fth ve
SFX H ve fths ve

SFX h Y 1
SFX h y iedly [^aeiou]y

SFX H Y 27
SFX H y ieth y
SFX H y ieths y
SFX H а е а
SFX H а ей ща
SFX H а ею ща
SFX H а и [гжкхчшщ]а
SFX H а ой [^жцчшщ]а
SFX H а ою [^жцчшщ]а
SFX H а у а
SFX H а ы [^гжкхчшщ]а
SFX H в вшая в
SFX H в вшее в
SFX H в вшей в
SFX H в вшем в
SFX H в вши в
SFX H в вшие в
SFX H в вший в
SFX H в вшим в
SFX H в вших в
SFX H в л в
SFX H в ть в
SFX H в ться в
SFX H я е [^и]я
SFX H я ей я
SFX H я ею я
SFX H я и я
SFX H я ю я

SFX i Y 21
SFX i 0 bedness [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX i 0 dedness [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX i 0 dness e
SFX i 0 edness [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX i 0 edness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX i 0 edness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX i 0 edness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX i 0 edness [aeiou]y
SFX i 0 fedness [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX i 0 gedness [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX i 0 kedness [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX i 0 kedness [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX i 0 ledness [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX i 0 medness [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX i 0 nedness [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX i 0 pedness [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX i 0 redness [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX i 0 sedness [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX i 0 tedness [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX i 0 vedness [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX i 0 zedness [^aeio][aeiou]z

SFX I Y 6
SFX I 0 м а
SFX I 0 м я
SFX I 0 ми а
SFX I 0 ми я
SFX I 0 х а
SFX I 0 х я

SFX i Y 1
SFX i y iedness [^aeiou]y

SFX I Y 31
SFX I а 0 [^к]а
SFX I а е а
SFX I а ей [цчшщ]а
SFX I а ею [цчшщ]а
SFX I а и [гжкхчшщ]а
SFX I а ой [^жцчшщ]а
SFX I а ою [^жцчшщ]а
SFX I а у а
SFX I а ы [^гжкхчшщ]а
SFX I йка ек йка
SFX I йня ен йня
SFX I ка ек [жцчш]ка
SFX I ка к [аеиоуыюя]ка
SFX I ка ок [^аежийоуцчшьыюя]ка
SFX I ня ен [^аезийоуыья]ня
SFX I чей чая чей
SFX I чей чем чей
SFX I чей чие чей
SFX I чей чий чей
SFX I чей чим чей
SFX I чей чих чей
SFX I чей чую чей
SFX I ька ек ька
SFX I ьня ен ьня
SFX I я е [^и]я
SFX I я ей я
SFX I я ею я
SFX I я и я
SFX I я й [еиу]я
SFX I я ь [аеиоуыя]ня
SFX I я ю я

SFX J Y 3
SFX J 0 bings [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX J 0 dings [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX J 0 fings [^aeio][aeiou]f

SFX j Y 2
SFX j 0 fully [^y]
SFX j 0 fully [aeiou]y

SFX J Y 38
SFX J 0 gings [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX J 0 ings [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX J 0 ings [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX J 0 ings [^e]
SFX J 0 ings [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX J 0 ings [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]
SFX J 0 ings [aeio][eiou]l
SFX J 0 ings [aeo]al
SFX J 0 ings [eoy]e
SFX J 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX J 0 kings [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX J 0 lings [^aeio][eiou]l
SFX J 0 lings [^aeo]al
SFX J 0 mings [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX J 0 nings [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX J 0 pings [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX J 0 rings [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX J 0 sings [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX J 0 tings [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX J 0 vings [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX J 0 zings [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX J 0 а [^ё]ж
SFX J 0 а [^еёжйоь]
SFX J 0 а [^ейоь]
SFX J 0 е [^ё]ж
SFX J 0 е [^еёжйоь]
SFX J 0 е [^ейоь]
SFX J 0 м [её]
SFX J 0 м е
SFX J 0 м о
SFX J 0 ом [^еёжйоцчшщь]
SFX J 0 ом [^ежйоцчшщь]
SFX J 0 у [^ё]ж
SFX J 0 у [^еёжйоь]
SFX J 0 у [^ейоь]
SFX J e ings [^eioy]e
SFX J e ings e
SFX J ie yings ie

SFX j Y 1
SFX j y ifully [^aeiou]y

SFX J Y 30
SFX J е а [жцшщ]е
SFX J ё е ьё
SFX J е и ие
SFX J е у [жцшщ]е
SFX J е ю [^жцшщ]е
SFX J ё ю ё
SFX J е я [^жцшщ]е
SFX J ё я ё
SFX J ёж ежа ёж
SFX J ёж еже ёж
SFX J ёж ежу ёж
SFX J й е [^и]й
SFX J й ем й
SFX J й и ий
SFX J й ю й
SFX J й я й
SFX J о а о
SFX J о е о
SFX J о у о
SFX J щей щая щей
SFX J щей щее щей
SFX J щей щие щей
SFX J щей щий щей
SFX J щей щим щей
SFX J щей щих щей
SFX J щей щую щей
SFX J ь е ь
SFX J ь ем ь
SFX J ь ю ь
SFX J ь я ь

SFX k Y 6
SFX k 0 ingly [^aeiou][cl]
SFX k 0 ingly [^ecl]
SFX k 0 ingly [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX k 0 ingly [eoy]e
SFX k 0 kingly [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX k 0 lingly [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX K Y 13
SFX K 0 а [^ейоь]
SFX K 0 ам [^ейоь]
SFX K 0 ами [^ейоь]
SFX K 0 ах [^ейоь]
SFX K 0 е [^ейоь]
SFX K 0 ей [жчшщ]
SFX K 0 и [гжкхчшщ]
SFX K 0 м е
SFX K 0 м о
SFX K 0 ов [^ежйоцчшщь]
SFX K 0 ом [^ежйоцчшщь]
SFX K 0 у [^ейоь]
SFX K 0 ы [^гежйкохчшщь]

SFX k Y 2
SFX k e ingly [^eioy]e
SFX k ie yingly ie

SFX K Y 50
SFX K е а [жцшщ]е
SFX K е ам [жцшщ]е
SFX K е ами [жцшщ]е
SFX K е ах [жцшщ]е
SFX K е ей [^жицщь]е
SFX K е и ие
SFX K е й ие
SFX K е у [жцшщ]е
SFX K е ю [^жцшщ]е
SFX K е я [^жцшщ]е
SFX K е ям [^жцшщ]е
SFX K е ями [^жцшщ]е
SFX K е ях [^жцшщ]е
SFX K ен ена ен
SFX K ен енная ен
SFX K ен енной ен
SFX K ен енные ен
SFX K ен енный ен
SFX K ен енных ен
SFX K ен ено ен
SFX K ен ены ен
SFX K й е [^и]й
SFX K й ев й
SFX K й ем й
SFX K й и [аеоуюя]й
SFX K й и ий
SFX K й ю й
SFX K й я й
SFX K й ям й
SFX K й ями й
SFX K й ях й
SFX K о 0 [вгдст]о
SFX K о а о
SFX K о ам о
SFX K о ами о
SFX K о ах о
SFX K о е о
SFX K о и [ичш]ко
SFX K о у о
SFX K ще щ ще
SFX K ь е ь
SFX K ь ей ь
SFX K ь ем ь
SFX K ь и ь
SFX K ь ю ь
SFX K ь я ь
SFX K ь ям ь
SFX K ь ями ь
SFX K ь ях ь
SFX K ье ий ье

SFX l Y 5
SFX l 0 ably [^aeiou][cl]
SFX l 0 ably [^cely]
SFX l 0 ably [acegilou]e
SFX l 0 ably [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX l 0 ably [aeiou]y

SFX L Y 3
SFX L 0 ament m
SFX L 0 aments m
SFX L 0 ament's m

SFX l Y 2
SFX l 0 kably [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX l 0 lably [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX L Y 10
SFX L 0 ment .
SFX L 0 ment [^my]
SFX L 0 ment [aeiou]y
SFX L 0 ments [^my]
SFX L 0 ment's [^my]
SFX L 0 ments [aeiou]y
SFX L 0 ment's [aeiou]y
SFX L 0 ла [^аиья]
SFX L 0 ли [^аиья]
SFX L 0 ло [^аиья]

SFX l Y 2
SFX l e ably [^acegilou]e
SFX l y iably [^aeiou]y

SFX L Y 62
SFX L y iment [^aeiou]y
SFX L y iments [^aeiou]y
SFX L y iment's [^aeiou]y
SFX L а и а
SFX L а о а
SFX L ась ись ась
SFX L ась ось ась
SFX L езти ёз зти
SFX L ести ёл ести
SFX L естись ёлся естись
SFX L есть ел честь
SFX L есть ёл честь
SFX L есть ла честь
SFX L есть ли честь
SFX L есть ло честь
SFX L ечь ёк ечь
SFX L ечься ёкся ечься
SFX L зти з зти
SFX L зть з зть
SFX L сти л [^е]сти
SFX L сти л сти
SFX L сти ла сти
SFX L сти ли сти
SFX L сти ло сти
SFX L стись лась стись
SFX L стись лись стись
SFX L стись лось стись
SFX L стись лся [^е]стись
SFX L стись лся стись
SFX L сть л [^ч].сть
SFX L сть ла [^ч].сть
SFX L сть ли [^ч].сть
SFX L сть ло [^ч].сть
SFX L сться лась сться
SFX L сться лись сться
SFX L сться лось сться
SFX L сться лся сться
SFX L ся лась [^аиья]ся
SFX L ся лись [^аиья]ся
SFX L ся лось [^аиья]ся
SFX L ти ла зти
SFX L ти ли зти
SFX L ти ло зти
SFX L ть л [^зс]ть
SFX L ть ла [^с]ть
SFX L ть ли [^с]ть
SFX L ть ло [^с]ть
SFX L ться лась [^с]ться
SFX L ться лись [^с]ться
SFX L ться лось [^с]ться
SFX L ться лся [^зс]ться
SFX L ться ся зться
SFX L чь к [^е]чь
SFX L чь к чь
SFX L чь кла чь
SFX L чь кли чь
SFX L чь кло чь
SFX L чься клась чься
SFX L чься клись чься
SFX L чься клось чься
SFX L чься кся [^е]чься
SFX L чься кся чься

SFX m Y 12
SFX m 0 man [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 man [^bdeknmt]
SFX m 0 man [^bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 man's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 man's [^bdeknmt]
SFX m 0 man's [^bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 men [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 men [^bdeknmt]
SFX m 0 men [^bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 men's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 men's [^bdeknmt]
SFX m 0 men's [^bdklmnt]e

SFX M Y 1
SFX M 0 's .

SFX m Y 8
SFX m 0 sman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 sman [bdknmt]
SFX m 0 sman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 sman's [bdknmt]
SFX m 0 smen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 smen [bdknmt]
SFX m 0 smen's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX m 0 smen's [bdknmt]
